District of Columbia statutes.
50-2501

Declaration of policy.

In an effort to combat the parking shortages in areas of the District to be defined, the Council finds it necessary to create an independent corporate body for the acquisition, construction and operation of public off-street parking facilities for motorized and nonmotorized vehicles in the District. The intent of the Council in enacting this legislation is to increase the number of public parking facilities and promote economic growth as well as encourage commercial revitalization.

History

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-153, § 2, 41 DCR 4652

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-841.